Hawaii statutes.
[§200-35] Uniformity. This part shall
be interpreted and construed in the manner best able to effectuate the general
purposes of attaining uniformity in the laws of the State, and with the laws of
other states and the United States. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next